Tennessee statutes. Title 62 Professions, Businesses and Trades
Chapter 43 Tennessee Professional Employer Organization Act
62-43-109. Professional employer organization deemed employer.

A professional employer organization shall be deemed an employer of its covered employees and shall pay state unemployment premiums as required by the Tennessee Employment Security Law, compiled in title 50, chapter 7 and as amended.

A professional employer organization shall keep separate records and submit separate state unemployment insurance wage and premium reports with payments pursuant to title 50, chapter 7, part 4 and as amended, to report the covered employees of each client by using the client's state employer account number as provided for in subsection (c) and using the premium rate based on the aggregate reserve ratio of the professional employer organization as provided in subsection (d).

For each professional employer organization having one (1) or more covered employees with a client in this state, such professional employer organization shall file an application with the chief administrative officer of the division of employment security of the department of labor and workforce development for an account number for each client having one (1) or more covered employees in this state; provided, the application shall include:

The aggregate state number assigned to the professional employer organization, along with the name, address and phone number of the professional employer organization;

The name, physical address and phone number of the client;

The name of the client's owner, partners, corporate officers, limited liability company members and managers, if board managed, or general partners;

The federal identification number of the client;

The signature of the client's principal or attorney in fact;

A brief description of the client's major business activity, listing any products produced or sold, or service provided; and

Any other information which may be required by the department of labor and workforce development.

The professional employer organization shall notify the department of labor and workforce development in writing of any additions or deletions of clients during the quarter in which such changes occur.

All information furnished to the department of labor and workforce development under this subsection (c) shall be treated as confidential information as provided in § 50-7-701 and as amended.

A professional employer organization shall determine the aggregate reserve ratio of a professional employer organization by using one (1) of the following two (2) methods:

Total all the state unemployment premiums paid on both the state taxable wages of a professional employer organization and on the state taxable wages of all the clients of such professional employer organization for all years during which the professional employer organization has been subject to title 50, chapter 7 and all the years each individual client has been a client of the professional employer organization as of the computation date, as provided in § 50-7-403(k)(1) and as amended;

Subtract therefrom the total of all benefits charged to the aggregate reserve account of the professional employer organization for all years, including the benefits charged resulting from benefits paid to covered employees of each individual client for all the years each client has been a client of the professional employer organization as of the computation date;

Divide the difference determined in subdivision (d)(1)(A)(ii) by the average taxable payroll for the three (3) most recently completed calendar years, ending on the computation date, of the professional employer organization, plus the average taxable payroll of each client for that portion of the three-year period during which such client was a client of the professional employer organization;

The resulting quotient shall be the aggregate reserve ratio of the professional employer organization beginning the July 1 following the computation date; and

The employer premium rate for the professional employer organization shall be determined by matching its aggregate reserve ratio to the appropriate premium rate table pursuant to title 50, chapter 7 and as amended; or

In cases where the aggregate reserve account of a professional employer organization has not been chargeable with benefits for thirty-six (36) consecutive months ending on the computation date, the professional employer organization shall be assigned the new employer premium rate based upon the reserve ratio of the professional employer organization's industrial classification as determined pursuant to § 50-7-403(b)(1)(B) and as amended.

A professional employer organization shall not be considered a successor employer, within the meaning of title 50, chapter 7 and as amended, to any client and shall not acquire the experience history of any client with whom there is not any common ownership, management or control. The client, upon terminating its relationship with the professional employer organization, shall not be considered a successor employer, within the meaning of title 50, chapter 7 and as amended, to the professional employer organization and shall not acquire any portion of the experience history of the aggregate reserve account of the professional employer organization with whom there is not any common ownership, management or control. For purposes of this subsection (e), the existence of professional employer agreement, without other evidence of common control, shall not constitute common ownership, management or control.

A client shall be jointly and severally liable with a professional employer organization for state unemployment premiums for each of the client's covered employees; provided, however, that a client shall be relieved of joint and several liability for state unemployment premiums if the professional employer organization has posted a corporate surety bond, as described in this subsection (f), with the administrator of the division of employment security of the Tennessee department of labor and workforce development in the amount of one hundred thousand dollars ($100,000) for so long as the bond remains in force.

The corporate surety bond shall be in form and content approved by the department of labor and workforce development as evidenced by the department's written consent thereto, and shall be issued by an organization currently licensed and authorized to issue the bond in this state.

The bond shall be conditioned for the benefit of the department of labor and workforce development, who may enforce the bond to collect unpaid unemployment insurance premiums, interest and penalties owed by the professional employer organization pursuant to title 50, chapter 7, part 4 and as amended.

Any surety is required to provide the administrator of the division of employment security of the department of labor and workforce development sixty (60) days' notice of cancellation of the bond.

If after three (3) full calendar years, throughout which a professional employer organization has paid all unemployment insurance premiums due in a timely manner and has a positive unemployment insurance reserve account, the bond may be reduced to an amount no less than thirty-five thousand dollars ($35,000) as determined and approved by the administrator conditioned upon the total taxable payroll for the previous calendar year and other factors deemed relevant by the administrator.

Any reduced bond shall be subject to review on no less than an annual basis by the administrator, who may adjust the required amount of the bond as is deemed appropriate.

Acts 2012, ch. 1081, § 1.

62-43-110. Duties of professional employer organization.

A professional employer organization shall:

Ensure that its Tennessee covered employees are covered by workers' compensation insurance provided in accordance with title 50 and the applicable Tennessee insurance laws and regulations as amended;

Notify the department and its clients within ten (10) days of any notice of cancellation of its workers' compensation coverage; and

Notify the department and its workers' compensation carrier, if applicable, of the termination of the professional employer organization's relationship with any client with covered employees in this state.

The professional employer organization shall be entitled along with the client to the exclusivity of the remedy under both the workers' compensation and employer's liability provisions of a workers' compensation policy or plan that either party has secured.

Acts 2012, ch. 1081, § 1.

62-43-111. Collecting and assessing sales tax.

Covered employees whose services are subject to sales tax shall be deemed the employees of the client for purposes of collecting and levying sales tax on the services performed by the covered employee. Nothing contained in this chapter shall relieve a client of any sales tax liability with respect to its goods or services.

Any tax or assessment imposed upon professional employer services or any business license or other fee which is based upon “gross receipts” shall allow a deduction from the gross income or receipts of the business derived from performing professional employer services that is equal to that portion of the fee charged to a client that represents the actual cost of wages and salaries, benefits, workers' compensation, payroll taxes, withholding or other assessments paid to or on behalf of a covered employee by the professional employer organization under a professional employer agreement.

Any tax assessed or assessment or mandated expenditure on a per capita or per employee basis shall be assessed against the client for covered employees and against the professional employer organization for its employees who are not covered employees co-employed with a client. Benefits or monetary consideration that meet the requirements of mandates imposed on a client and that are received by covered employees through the professional employer organization either through payroll or through benefit plans sponsored by the professional employer organization shall be credited against the client's obligation to fulfill such mandates.

In the case of a tax or an assessment imposed or calculated upon the basis of total payroll, the professional employer organization shall be eligible to apply any small business allowance or exemption available to the client for the covered employees for purpose of computing the tax.

Except to the extent provided otherwise in the professional employer agreement with a client, a professional employer organization is not liable for the general debts, obligations, loss of profits, business goodwill or other consequential special or incidental damages of a client with which it has entered into a professional employer agreement.

This section applies to this state and local governmental entities.

Acts 2012, ch. 1081, § 1.

62-43-112. Violations — Grounds for action.

No person shall:

Submit false information to the department;

Make a materially false entry in the records of a professional employer organization; or

Violate this chapter.

The following constitute grounds for which the department may take action under subsection (c) against a person subject to this chapter:

Being convicted of an offence or disciplined as described in § 62-43-106(b)(7);

Committing a prohibited act under subsection (a);

Making, issuing, circulating or causing to be made, issued or circulated, any estimate, illustration, circular, statement, advertisement, sales presentation, omission or comparison that misrepresents the benefits, advantages, conditions or terms of any professional employer services or is otherwise untrue, deceptive or misleading;

Entering into any agreement to commit or, by any concerted action, committing any act of boycott, coercion or intimidation resulting in or tending to result in unreasonable restraint of or monopoly in the business of employee leasing; or

Permitting to be used or using, permitting to be filed or filing, any name, trade name, fictitious name or business identity which is the same as, similar to or may be confused with the name, trade name, fictitious name or business identity of an existing licensee, any governmental agency or any nonprofit organization.

For violating subsection (a) or when grounds exist under subsection (b), the department may:

Issue an order:

To comply with the chapter; or

To cease and desist;

Impose an administrative penalty not to exceed one thousand dollars ($1,000) for each set of facts constituting a separate violation;

Restrict or suspend a registration;

Place the registrant on probation for a period of time not to exceed the next full term of registration where the registrant is subject to the terms and conditions determined by the department;

Deny an application or revoke a registration; or

Enjoin or restrain by bringing an action in the chancery court of Davidson County.

If the department finds that a violation has occurred or that grounds exist to take an action under subsection (c), the department shall consider the following when determining what action to take:

Whether the person committing the act or failing to act did so:

Knowingly;

Recklessly;

Repeatedly; or

Relying on information of another person or was subject to an illegal act;

The materiality and severity of the violation; and

The person's actions to cure the violation.

If the action under subdivision (c)(5) is taken by the department:

The department shall notify:

The department of labor and workforce development; and

Each client of which the department has knowledge of the department's action; and

The person with a revoked registration shall:

Immediately cease soliciting clients for professional employer services;

Not execute additional professional employer agreements or enter into any arrangement wherein it agrees to provide professional employer services;

Wind down the operations of the professional employer organization so that the professional employer organization will no longer be in operation sixty (60) days after the effective date of the revocation; and

Return the registration that was revoked to the department.

The department may make or cause to be made investigations, audits or reviews within or without this state as the department deems necessary:

To determine whether a person has violated or is in danger of violating this chapter, including any regulation or rule promulgated under this chapter; or

To aid in the enforcement of this chapter.

All material compiled by the department in any investigation, audit or review under this section shall be confidential and exempt from public disclosure pursuant to title 10, chapter 7 and as amended, until ten (10) days after a finding of probable cause resulting from the investigation, audit or review; however, financial information, including, but not limited to, client lists, obtained by the department in connection with investigations, audits or reviews shall be kept confidential and exempt from the public disclosure requirements of title 10, chapter 7.

The department may impose upon the person found to have violated this chapter the cost of investigation and prosecution, including reasonable attorney fees.

The Uniform Administrative Procedures Act, compiled in title 4, chapter 5 and as amended, governs all matters and procedures regarding the hearing and judicial review of any contested case arising under this chapter.

Acts 2012, ch. 1081, § 1.

62-43-113. Severability.

The provisions of this chapter are severable. If any provision of this chapter or application thereof to any person or circumstance, is held invalid, such invalidity shall not affect other provisions or applications of this chapter which can be given effect without the invalid provision or application.

Acts 2012, ch. 1081, § 1.

62-43-114. Rules of the former Tennessee Employee Leasing Act remain in effect — Effect of current licenses — Recent appointments to advisory board.

Rules promulgated pursuant to the Tennessee Employee Leasing Act, that are in effect prior to May 21, 2012, shall remain in effect unless such rules are in conflict with this chapter or until modified or repealed by the department.

A plan, adopted by a study committee establishing criteria for a staff leasing company sponsoring and maintaining a plan for self-insurance for health benefits on or before January 1, 1998, shall be deemed a rule of the department and shall remain in effect unless such rule is in conflict with this chapter or until modified or repealed by the department.

A current license in effect at May 21, 2012, shall remain in effect until one hundred eighty (180) days after the close of the licensee's current fiscal year.

The most recent appointments to the advisory board under the Tennessee Employee Leasing Act shall be considered appointments to the advisory council unless the governor appoints a successor to an expired term.

Acts 2012, ch. 1081, § 1.